it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Football americano > Attrezzatura protettiva da football americano > Caschi da football americano: Caschi da football americano replica e da collezione; Caschi morbidi da football americano
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Fútbol americano > Equipo de protección de fútbol americano > Cascos de fútbol americano: Cascos de fútbol americano de réplica y de colección; Cascos blandos de fútbol americano
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng bầu dục Mỹ > Đồ bảo hộ chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ > Mũ bảo hiểm chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ: Mũ bảo hiểm bóng bầu dục Mỹ mô hình và sưu tầm; Mũ bảo hiểm bóng bầu dục Mỹ vỏ mềm
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Futbol amerykański > Ochraniacze do futbolu amerykańskiego > Kaski do futbolu amerykańskiego: Kaski kolekcjonerskie i repliki do futbolu amerykańskiego; Miękkie kaski do futbolu amerykańskiego
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Amerikan Futbolu > Amerikan Futbolu Koruyucu Ekipman > Amerikan Futbolu Kasklar: Replika ve koleksiyonluk Amerikan futbolu kaskları; Yumuşak yüzeyli Amerikan futbolu kaskları
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Futebol americano > Equipamento de proteção para futebol americano > Capacetes de futebol americano: Capacetes de futebol americano de colecionador e réplicas; Capacetes soft shell de futebol americano
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Американский футбол > Защитная экипировка для американского футбола > Шлемы для американского футбола: Реплики и коллекционные шлемы для американского футбола; Мягкие шлемы для американского футбола
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 美式足球 > 美式足球護具 > 美式足球頭盔: 復刻版與收藏版美式足球頭盔; 軟殼美式足球頭盔
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 아메리칸 풋볼 > 미식축구 보호 장비 > 미식축구 헬멧: 레플리카 및 수집용 미식축구 헬멧; 소프트 쉘 미식축구 헬멧
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > American Football > Schutzbekleidung für American Football > Helme für American Football: Replika- & Sammlerhelme für American Football; Soft-Shell-Helme für American Football
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Amerikansk fotball > Beskyttelsesutstyr for amerikansk fotball > Hjelmer for amerikansk fotball: Kopier og samlehjelmer for amerikansk fotball; Softshell-hjelmer for amerikansk fotball
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > American Football > American Football beschermende uitrusting > American Football helmen: Replica- en verzamelhelmen voor American football; Softshellhelmen voor American football
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Американски футбол > Защитна екипировка за американски футбол > Каски за американски футбол: Реплики и колекционерски каски за американски футбол; Каски за американски футбол с мека обвивка
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Futebol Americano > Equipamento de Proteção de Futebol Americano > Capacetes de Futebol Americano: Capacetes de futebol americano de réplica e coleção; Capacetes macios de futebol americano
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > American Football > American Football Protective Gear > American Football Helmets: Replica & Collectible American Football Helmets; Soft Shell American Football Helmets
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > อเมริกันฟุตบอล > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันอเมริกันฟุตบอล > หมวกกันน็อคอเมริกันฟุตบอล: หมวกอเมริกันฟุตบอลจำลองและของสะสม; หมวกอเมริกันฟุตบอลแบบนิ่ม
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Americký fotbal > Ochranná výstroj pro americký fotbal > Helmy pro americký fotbal: Sběratelské helmy a repliky helem na americký fotbal; Helmy s měkkou skořepinou na americký fotbal
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Ameriški nogomet > Zaščitna oprema za ameriški nogomet > Čelade za ameriški nogomet: Replike in zbirateljske čelade za ameriški nogomet; Čelade za ameriški nogomet z mehko lupino
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > アメリカンフットボール > アメリカンフットボール用プロテクター > アメリカンフットボール用ヘルメット: アメリカンフットボール用レプリカ・観賞用ヘルメット; アメリカンフットボール用ソフトシェルヘルメット
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Amerikietiškasis futbolas > Amerikietiškojo futbolo apsauginės priemonės > Amerikietiškojo futbolo šalmai: Amerikietiškojo futbolo šalmų replikos ir kolekciniai modeliai; Minkšto korpuso amerikietiškojo futbolo šalmai
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Fotbal american > Echipament de protecție pentru fotbal american > Căști de fotbal american: Căști replici și de colecție pentru fotbal american; Căști moi pentru fotbal american
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Αμερικανικό ποδόσφαιρο > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου > Κράνη αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου: Αντίγραφα και συλλεκτικά κράνη αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Μαλακά κράνη αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 美式橄榄球 > 美式橄榄球护具 > 美式橄榄球头盔: 复刻版与收藏版美式橄榄球头盔; 软壳美式橄榄球头盔
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Americký futbal > Ochranné vybavenie pre americký futbal > Prilby na americký futbal: Repliky a zberateľské prilby na americký futbal; Softshellové prilby na americký futbal
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Amerikansk fodbold – bold > Amerikansk fodbold – beskyttelsesudstyr > Amerikansk fodbold – hjelme: Replikahjelme og samlerobjekter til amerikansk fodbold; Soft shell-hjelme til amerikansk fodbold
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Amerikai futball > Amerikaifutball-védőfelszerelés > Amerikaifutball-sisakok: Replika és gyűjtői amerikai futball sisakok; Puha héjú amerikai futball sisakok
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Football américain > Équipements de protection pour le football américain > Casques de football américain: Répliques et casques de football américain de collection; Casques de football américain à coque souple
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Amerikansk fotboll > Amerikansk fotboll skyddsutrustning > Amerikansk fotboll hjälmar: Replikor och samlarhjälmar för amerikansk fotboll; Mjuka hjälmar för amerikansk fotboll
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Američki nogomet > Zaštitna oprema za američki nogomet > Kacige za američki nogomet: Replike i kolekcionarske kacige za američki nogomet; Kacige za američki nogomet s mekim oklopom
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Amerikkalainen jalkapallo > Suojavarusteet, amerikkalainen jalkapallo > Kypärät, amerikkalainen jalkapallo: Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon replika- ja keräilykypärät; Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon pehmeät kypärät